West Virginia, session 2025, HB2482.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 2. Wildlife Resources. §20-2-46n. Allowance for youths and Class Q special hunting permit carriers to take an antlered deer. (a) A youth hunter or a Class Q permit holder legally participating in the “Special Youth Deer Season” established by the Natural Resources Commission pursuant to §20-1-17(b)(7) of this code, shall be allowed to take one antlered deer during that special season. Any antlered deer taken during this special season shall apply toward regular firearms deer hunting season bag limit.(b) No class XS license holder shall be entitled to take an antlered deer according to the “Special Youth Deer Season” privileges established pursuant to this section.